Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-240
Extraterritorial airport; terms, defined.

As used in sections 3-240 to 3-244, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Airport means any area of land or water which is used or intended for use, for the landing and taking off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or rights-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.

(2) Air navigation facility means any facility, other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in, aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities.

(3) Governmental agency means any municipality, city, village, county, public corporation, or other public agency.

Laws 1949, c. 1, § 1, p. 55.